src/orthography/evv2norm.xfscript
! ====================================== !
! Orthographic converter Eric Vászolyi-Vasse's transcription !
! ====================================== !

! Examples:
! ićɛt-dyrji mi jona rad'ejtlɨm vorsnɨ ćomjɛn.
! pervɛj bat'-mam koram vøćnɨ ćom. ćomsɛ vøćɛnɨ
! pøwjasɨś, čøkɨdǯɨkɛ siʒ́ med øt'i bokɨs inmis śt'enas.
! me rød'iććyli požńa d'erevńayn kod uht'inskej
! rajonyn. d'erevńays sulale iźva ju bokyn, di vylyn.

! This program translates text written in the Specimina Sibirica
! series by Eric Vászolyi-Vasse into modern Komi-Zyrian orthography,
! or to a close approximant used in IKDP project.

! Based to rus/src/orthography/latin2cyrillic.xfscript

! echo <<defining Cns and Vow...>>


define Vow       [ a | á | e | ɛ | i | ɨ | o | u | y | æ | ø | å | ä | ö | 
                   A | Á | E | I | O | U | Y | Æ | Ø | Å | Ä | Ö | 
é | ó | ú | í | à | è | ò | ù | ì | ë | ü | ï | â | ê | ô | û | î | ã | ý 
É | Ó | Ú | Í | À | È | Ò | Ù | Ì | Ë | Ü | Ï | Â | Ê | Ô | Û | Î | Ã | Ý ] ;


define Cns [ b | c | ć | č | d | đ | ǯ | ʒ́ | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | ń | ŋ | ñ | ń | 
             B | C | Č | D | Đ | F | G | H | J | K | L | M | N | Ŋ | Ñ | Ń |
             p | q | r | s | ś | š | t | ŧ | v | w | x | z | ź | ž |   
             P | Q | R | S | Š | T | Ŧ | V | W | X | Z | Ž] ; 

define Characters [ ' ] ;

define NonpairedCns [ б | в | г | ж | й | к | м | 
                  п | р | ф | х | ч | ш | щ |
                  Б | В | Г | Ж | Й | К | М |
                  П | Р | Ф | Х | Ч | Ш | Щ ] ;

define CyrVow    [ а | э | ы | о | ӧ | у | я | е | и | ё | ю
                   А | Э | Ы | О | Ӧ | У | Я | Е | И | Ё | Ю ] ;

define NonPalVow [ а | э | ы | о | ӧ | у | я | е | и | ё | ю ] ;

define PalVow    [ А | Э | Ы | О | У | Я | Е | И | Ё | Ю ] ;

define CyrCns   [ б | в | г | д | ж | з | й | к | л | м | н | 
                  п | р | с | т | ф | х | ц | ч | ш | щ |
                  Б | В | Г | Д | Ж | З | Й | К | Л | М | Н |
                  П | Р | С | Т | Ф | Х | Ц | Ч | Ш | Щ ] ;

define Syll Cns* Vow+ Cns* ;

echo << Rules >>

define lexicalexceptions [

{Hamsun} -> {Гамсун} ,
{Sigurd} -> {Сигурд} , 
{Harald} -> {Харальд} ,
{Helsingfors} -> {Гелсингфорс}

] ;

# define frontC c -> s , C -> S || _ [ i | e | æ | y ] ;
# define backC  c -> k , C -> K || _ [ a | o | u ] ;
# define backO  o -> u , O -> U || _ n [ g | d ] ;

# define diphth ø y -> о й , Ø y -> О й , 
#              e y -> е й , E y -> Є й , 
#              a u -> э у , A u -> Э у ;

define shortUandO u -> у , U -> У , o -> о , O -> О || _ Cns Cns [.#.|Cns] ;


define consassim d -> 0 || n _ [.#.|Cns] ,,
                 d -> 0 || l _ [.#.|Cns] ;
#                 d -> 0 || r _ [.#.|Cns] ; # they like the -rd


define specialL l -> л , L -> Л || [ o | å | a | O | Å | A ] (e|h|r) _ ;
define generalL l -> л ь , L -> Л Ь ;

define specialI i -> і || \[ NonpairedCns ] _ ;
define normalI i -> и || [ .#. | Vow | NonpairedCns ] _ ;

define initialconsgroups [ 
   C h r -> К р ,
   G j ø -> Ё ,
   G j o -> Ю ,
   G j a -> Я ,
   S k j -> Ш ,
   S j   -> Ш , 
   S k i -> Ш и ,
   S k y -> Ш ю ,
   H j a -> Я ,
   H j e -> Е ,
   H j ø -> Ё ,
   H j o -> Ю ,
   K j   -> Х ,
   k j   -> x
   ] ;


! the big conversion rule

define Convert a -> а , A -> А , 
      b -> б ,     B -> Б , 
      c -> к ,     C -> К , 
      d -> д ,     D -> Д , 
      ʒ́ -> дз,
      ǯ -> дж,
      e -> е ,     E -> Е , 
      ɛ -> ö,
      f -> ф ,     F -> Ф , 
      g -> г ,     G -> Г , 
      h -> х ,     H -> Х , 
      i -> и ,     I -> И , 
      ɨ -> ы ,
      j -> й ,     J -> Й , 
      k -> к ,     K -> К , 
      m -> м ,     M -> М , 
      n -> н ,     N -> Н , 
      ń -> нь,
      o -> о ,     O -> О ,
      ö -> ӧ ,     Ö -> Ӧ ,
      p -> п ,     P -> П , 
      q -> к ,     Q -> К , 
      r -> р ,     R -> Р , 
      s -> с ,     S -> С , 
      ś -> сь,
      š -> ш,
      t -> т ,     T -> Т , 
      u -> у ,     U -> У , 
      v -> в ,     V -> В , 
      w -> в ,     W -> В , 
      x -> к с ,   X -> К С , 
      y -> ы ,     Y -> Ы , 
      z -> з ,     Z -> З ,
      ź -> зь , 
      ä -> я ,     Ä -> Я , 
      æ -> я ,     Æ -> Я , 
      ø -> ӧ ,     Ø -> Ӧ ,
      å -> о ,     Å -> О , 
      č -> тш ,    Č -> Тш ,
      ć -> ч ,      Ć -> Ч ,
      đ -> д ,     Đ -> Д ,
      ŋ -> ӊ ,     Ŋ -> Н ,
      š -> ш ,     Š -> Ш ,
      Ž -> ж ,     Ž -> Ж ; 
      

define CVinContext й  -> ь || CyrCns _ CyrVow ;


define iDiphthong и -> й || CyrVow _ ;

define CV й а -> я ,
          Й а -> Я ,
          й е -> е ,
          Й е -> Е ,
          й о -> ё ,
          Й о -> Ё ,
          й у -> йы ,
          Й у -> ЙЫ ;

echo << Compile... >>

read regex [
     lexicalexceptions
 .o. specialI
 .o. shortUandO
 .o. consassim
 .o. specialL
 .o. generalL
 .o. initialconsgroups
 .o. Convert
 .o. CVinContext
 .o. iDiphthong
 .o. CV
 .o. specialI
 .o. normalI
 ] ;


# xfst -f misc/transliteration_test.xfst && echo "ićɛt-dyrji mi jona rad'ejtlɨm vorsnɨ ćomjɛn. pervɛj bat'-mam koram vøćnɨ ćom. ćomsɛ vøćɛnɨ pøwjasɨś, čøkɨdǯɨkɛ siʒ́ med øt'i bokɨs inmis śt'enas." | lookup o2n.fst 

# xfst -e " source < src/orthography/evv2norm.xfscript"
# invert net
# save o2n.fst
# quit
# lookup o2n.fst 

# ićɛt-dyrji mi jona rad'ejtlɨm vorsnɨ ćomjɛn.
